Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 9. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 2091.
Attachment not waiver of implied lien.

A person holding personal property by a lien implied by law to ensure the payment of the debt secured by such lien, may cause the property to be attached on mesne process and sold on execution and such attachment shall not be a waiver of the lien.